Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3812
(UTC 201) Role of court in administration of trust.

(UTC 201) (a) The court may intervene in the administration of a trust to the extent its jurisdiction is invoked by an interested person or as provided by law.

(b) A trust is not subject to continuing judicial supervision unless ordered by the court.

(c) A judicial proceeding involving a trust may relate to any matter involving the trust's administration, including a request for instructions and an action to declare rights.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 12.

A beneficiary of property left to a trust has standing to raise the trustee's self-dealing and to seek damages, an accounting, and a constructive trust. In re Estate of Hedke, 278 Neb. 727, 775 N.W.2d 13 (2009).

A trust beneficiary's estate can seek to enforce the beneficiary's interests in the trust to the same extent that the beneficiary could have enforced his or her interests immediately before death, consistent with the standard provided in the Restatement (Third) of Trusts section 50, comment d(5). (2003). In re Trust Created by Hansen, 274 Neb. 199, 739 N.W.2d 170 (2007).

The remainder beneficiaries' motion for a declaration of rights was construed as a request for the court to instruct the trustee on its duties and powers when they asked the county court to decide whether the trustee could pay the billings for the beneficiary's last-illness expenses and, if so, what standards should be applied. In re Trust Created by Hansen, 274 Neb. 199, 739 N.W.2d 170 (2007).

This section does not limit to trustees the right to seek instructions from the court. In re Trust Created by Hansen, 274 Neb. 199, 739 N.W.2d 170 (2007).